Utah statutes.
11-38-203.   Commission may provide assistance to local entities.

The commission may:

(1)  from funds appropriated to the Governor's Office of Management and Budget by the Legislature for this purpose, grant money to local entities to help them obtain the technical assistance they need to:

(a)  conduct workshops or public hearings or use other similar methods to obtain public input and participation in the process of identifying for that entity the principles of quality growth referred to in Subsection 11-38-202(1)(f);

(b)  identify where and how quality growth areas could be established within the local entity; and

(c)  develop or modify the local entity's general plan to incorporate and implement the principles of quality growth developed by the local entity and to establish quality growth areas; and

(2)  require each local entity to which the commission grants money under Subsection (1) to report to the commission, in a format and upon a timetable determined by the commission, on that local entity's process of developing quality growth principles and on the quality growth principles developed by that local entity.



Amended by Chapter 310, 2013 General Session

